Utah statutes.
61-2f-409.   Actions for recovery of compensation restricted.
(1)  A person may not bring or maintain an action in any court of this state
for the recovery of a commission, fee, or compensation for any act done or
service rendered which is prohibited under this chapter to other than
principal brokers, unless the person was licensed as a principal broker at the
time of the doing of the act or rendering the service.
(2) (a)  A sales agent or associate broker may not sue in that individual's
own name for the recovery of a fee, commission, or compensation for services
as a sales agent or associate broker unless the action is against the
principal broker with whom the sales agent or associate broker is or was
affiliated.
(b)  An action for the recovery of a fee, commission, or other compensation
may only be instituted and brought by the principal broker with whom a sales
agent or associate broker is affiliated.
